Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.080

Exception based on belief recording not required.

(1) A custodial interrogation to which RCW 10.122.030 otherwise applies need not be recorded electronically if the interrogation occurs when no law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation has knowledge of facts and circumstances that would lead an officer reasonably to believe that the individual being interrogated may have committed an act for which RCW 10.122.030 requires that a custodial interrogation be recorded electronically.

(2) If, during a custodial interrogation under subsection (1) of this section, the individual being interrogated reveals facts and circumstances giving a law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation reason to believe that an act has been committed for which RCW 10.122.030 requires that a custodial interrogation be recorded electronically, continued custodial interrogation concerning that act must be recorded electronically, if feasible.

[ 2021 c 329 s 8.]